Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2704
Health care providers; standards; effect of health care crisis protocol.

The health care crisis protocol does not change or alter the standard for malpractice or professional negligence for health care providers set forth in section 44-2810.

Laws 2021, LB139, § 8.

COVID-19 Liability Act, see section 25-3601.